Utah statutes.
10-3-910.   Heads of departments and subordinate officers.
The administration of the police and fire departments shall consist of a chief
of the department and such officers, members, employees and agents as the
board of commissioners may by ordinance prescribe, and the board of
commissioners shall appoint the heads of such departments.
